Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 5. Size, Weight and Load

§ 63-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Highway Traffic Regulation Law – Size, Weight and Load Regulations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8126; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-5-3.
Construction.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8282; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-5-5.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the meanings ascribed to the words and phrases in Article 3 of Chapter 3 of this title, shall be fully applicable to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8126; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-5-7.
Operation of vehicle in violation of chapter.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to drive or move or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved on any highway any vehicle or vehicles of a size or weight exceeding the limitations stated in this chapter or otherwise in violation of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8264; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-5-9.
Applicability of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter governing size, weight and load shall not apply to:

Fire apparatus;

Road machinery;

Vehicles operated under the terms of a special permit issued as provided in this chapter;

Any machinery or equipment used for normal farm purposes only, having a width in excess of the maximum requirements prescribed by this chapter, where such movement is performed during daylight hours, within a radius of fifty (50) miles of the point of origin thereof, and no part of such operation or movement is upon any highway designated and known as a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, or accesses thereto. Such machinery or towing vehicle shall be equipped with reflector lights, front and rear, and a blinking light clearly visible from the front and rear;

Any machinery or equipment intended to be used for normal farm purposes only and being delivered by an equipment dealer to a customer, having a width in excess of the maximum requirements prescribed by this chapter, where such movement is performed during daylight hours, and no part of such operation or movement is upon any highway designated and known as a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, or accesses thereto. Such machinery or any vehicle towing such equipment shall be equipped with reflector lights, front and rear, and a blinking light clearly visible from the front and rear;

Rubber-tire vehicles used for construction, warehousing, transportation of equipment or material or for other purposes not exempted under this section if such vehicles are not designed primarily for use or operation on a public road, street or highway; provided, that such vehicles shall not be operated on any public road, street or highway of this state except along and adjacent to the site where such vehicles are primarily used. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed as requiring the vehicles described in this paragraph to obtain a motor vehicle license tag or a motor vehicle inspection sticker when operated on a public road, street or highway in accordance with the provisions of this paragraph; or

Rubber-tire vehicles designed or adapted to be used exclusively in the preparation and loading of chemicals or other material for aerial agricultural application to crops, where such movement is performed during daylight hours, within a radius of fifty (50) miles of the point of origin thereof, and no part of such operation or movement is upon any highway designated and known as a part of the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8264; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1976, ch. 351; Laws, 1988, ch. 400; Laws, 2002, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 433, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2003.

§ 63-5-11.
Power and authority of local authorities to alter limitations.

The maximum size and weight of vehicles specified in this chapter shall be lawful throughout the state, and local authorities shall have no power or authority to alter the limitations stated in this chapter except as express authority to do so may be granted in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8264; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-5-13.
Outside width of vehicles.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the total outside width of any vehicle, exclusive of required safety devices, or the load thereon shall not exceed eight and one-half (8-1/2) feet; provided, however, that appurtenances on recreational vehicles shall be allowed so long as they are inside the exterior rearview mirrors of the recreational vehicle or inside the exterior rearview mirrors of the vehicle towing the recreational vehicle, and such mirrors do not extend further than necessary to obtain the appropriate field of view.

The total outside load width of any vehicle hauling unprocessed forest products on public roads, streets or highways, other than interstate highways, shall not exceed nine and one-half (9-1/2) feet if such products may not be shortened without rendering them useless for the end product for which they were cut; provided, however, the total outside vehicle width of such a vehicle, exclusive of required safety devices and the load of such vehicle, shall not exceed eight and one-half (8-1/2) feet.

The total outside width of a farm tractor shall not exceed ten (10) feet, except that farm tractors shall not be operated upon the interstate highways without a special permit from the Mississippi Department of Transportation.

A vehicle designed and especially constructed to transport raw cotton from harvest to the cotton gin may have a total outside width not to exceed nine (9) feet whenever any such vehicle is being operated within a radius of fifty (50) miles of the vehicle’s home base or its contractual customer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8265; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 1; ch. 430; Laws, 1983, ch. 428, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 492, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 318, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 55; Laws, 2002, ch. 405, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 63-5-15.
Side projecting loads on passenger vehicles.

No passenger-type vehicle shall be operated on any highway with any load carried thereon extending beyond the line of the fenders on the left side of such vehicle or extending more than six inches beyond the line of the fenders on the right side thereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8266; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-5-17.
Height of vehicles.

No vehicle unladen or with load shall exceed a height of thirteen feet, six inches. However, no person, firm or corporation, or the State of Mississippi or any subdivision thereof, shall be required to raise, alter, construct or reconstruct any underpass, wire, pole, trestle, or other structure to permit the passage of any vehicle having a height, unladen or with load, in excess of twelve feet, six inches. Full liability for damage to any structure caused by any vehicle having a height in excess of twelve feet, six inches, shall be borne entirely by the motor carrier or operator of the vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8267; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 480; Laws, 1956, ch. 380; Laws, 1958, ch. 502; Laws, 1962, ch. 530; Laws, 1971, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1971).

§ 63-5-19.
Vehicle length limitations; generally.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no single vehicle, unladen or with load, shall have an overall length, inclusive of front and rear bumpers, in excess of forty (40) feet.

No semitrailer operating in a truck tractor-semitrailer combination and no trailer drawn by a motor vehicle shall exceed a length of fifty-three (53) feet.

No semitrailer or trailer operating in a truck tractor-semitrailer-trailer combination and no trailer operating in a double trailer combination drawn by a motor vehicle shall exceed a length of thirty (30) feet.

No semitrailer or trailer combinations in excess of two (2) units, excluding the towing motor vehicle, shall be allowed to operate on the highways of this state.

No motor home shall have an overall length exclusive of front and rear bumpers, in excess of forty-five (45) feet.

The load upon the rear vehicle of a combination of vehicles transporting forest or agricultural products in their natural state shall not project more than twenty-eight (28) feet beyond the rear axle of the vehicle except in the special circumstance hereinafter prescribed. If such products project more than twenty-eight (28) feet beyond the rear axle and, due to the end use for which they are intended (such as tall utility poles or light poles or the like), such products cannot be shortened without rendering them useless for the finished product for which they have been cut, then such special circumstance may be considered good cause for the obtaining of a permit which shall be procured pursuant to Section 63-5-51 before vehicles transporting such products may operate. Except as otherwise provided in Section 63-5-21, any vehicle transporting projecting loads as described in this subsection that extend four (4) feet or more beyond the rear or body of the vehicle shall operate only during daylight hours, and the load on vehicles designed to transport forestry products shall be secured by at least two (2) chains, two (2) wire ropes, or two (2) nylon straps, one (1) positioned behind the front bolster and one (1) in front of the back bolster.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 63-5-21, the rear projecting load of any vehicle operating during the period described under Section 63-7-11 may not extend four (4) feet or more beyond the rear or body of the vehicle, or as otherwise allowable by federal law.

The length limitations on projecting loads prescribed in this section do not apply to a single vehicle or the rear vehicle of a combination of vehicles designed for on-farm delivery and unloading of any agricultural product, in its natural or manufactured form, which is fitted with an auger or similar unloading device permanently affixed to the vehicle that extends no more than eight (8) feet horizontally beyond the rear or body of the vehicle provided that no portion of such device which extends four (4) feet or more beyond the rear or body of the vehicle is less than seven (7) feet above the roadway surface. However, any such vehicle may not be operated on the public highways, roads or streets of this state during the period described under Section 63-7-11.

A vehicle designed and especially constructed to transport raw cotton from harvest to the cotton gin may have a total overall length not to exceed fifty (50) feet whenever any such vehicle is being operated within a radius of fifty (50) miles of the vehicle’s home base or its contractual customer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8267; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 480; Laws, 1956, ch. 380; Laws, 1958, ch. 502; Laws, 1962, ch. 530; Laws, 1971, ch. 354, § 1; ch. 317; Laws, 1980, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 447, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 428, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 629, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 318, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 557, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 405, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 460, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2003.); Laws, 2019, ch. 374, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-5-21.
Vehicle length limitations; exceptions.

The length limitations provided in Section 63-5-19 shall not apply to vehicles operated at nighttime by a public utility transporting poles, pipes, machinery or other objects of a structural nature which cannot readily be dismembered when required for emergency repair of public service facilities or properties. However, in respect to such night transportation every such vehicle and the load thereon shall be equipped with a sufficient number of clearance lamps on both sides and marker lamps upon the extreme ends of any projecting load to clearly mark the dimensions of such load.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8267; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 480; Laws, 1956, ch. 380; Laws, 1958, ch. 502; Laws, 1962, ch. 530; Laws, 1971, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 447, § 2; Laws, 2001, ch. 557, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-5-23.
Front projecting loads on vehicles.

The load upon any vehicle operated alone, or the load upon the front vehicle of a combination of vehicles, shall not extend more than three (3) feet beyond the front wheels of such vehicle or the front bumper of such vehicle if it is equipped with such bumper, or as otherwise allowable by federal law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8267; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 480; Laws, 1956, ch. 380; Laws, 1958, ch. 502; Laws, 1962, ch. 530; Laws, 1971, ch. 354, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1971); Laws, 2019, ch. 374, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 63-5-25.
Connections for trailers and towed vehicles.

Every trailer which shall be towed on the public highways at a speed in excess of twenty (20) miles per hour shall be coupled to the towing vehicle by means of a safety chain, chains, cables, or equivalent devices in addition to the regular trailer hitch or coupling. This requirement does not apply to a semitrailer having a connecting device composed of a fifth wheel and kingpin assembly meeting the requirements of the Interstate Commerce Commission, nor to a pole, pipe, casing, long or piling dolly. No more slack shall be left in any such safety chains, cables or equivalent devices than shall be necessary to permit proper turning. The safety chains, cables or equivalent device shall be so connected to the towed and towing vehicles and to the drawbar to prevent the drawbar from dropping to the ground if the drawbar fails, and shall be of sufficient strength to control the trailer in event of failure of the regular trailer hitch or coupling.

When one (1) vehicle is towing another the drawbar or other connection shall be of sufficient strength to pull all weight towed thereby. Said drawbar or other connection shall not exceed fifteen (15) feet from one (1) vehicle to the other except the connection between any two (2) vehicles transporting poles, pipe, machinery or other objects of structural nature which cannot readily be dismembered.

When one (1) vehicle is towing another and the connection consists of a chain, rope, or cable, there shall be displayed upon such connection a white flag or cloth not less than twelve (12) inches square.

No more than three (3) vehicles in combination shall be towed by saddle-mounts, provided the overall length of the towing and towed vehicles shall not exceed seventy-five (75) feet in length. No more than one (1) motor vehicle shall be towed by tow bar.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 8267, 8269; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1950, ch. 480; Laws, 1956, ch. 380; Laws, 1958, ch. 502; Laws, 1962, ch. 530; Laws, 1964, ch. 457; Laws, 1971, ch. 354, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 327, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 478, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1993).

§ 63-5-27.
Wheel and axle loads.

Subject to the maximum gross single axle or tandem axle weights hereinafter specified, the gross single or tandem axle weights shall not exceed five hundred fifty (550) pounds per inch of tire width. The gross weight on any single or tandem axle thus derived shall be subject to a tolerance not in excess of five hundred (500) pounds provided that the total allowable gross weight of the single or tandem axle shall not exceed the maximum limitations allowed hereinafter.

The gross weight imposed on the highway by the wheels of any one (1) single axle of a vehicle shall not exceed twenty thousand (20,000) pounds exclusive of the tolerance provided in Section 63-5-33. A single axle shall be defined as an assembly of two (2) or more wheels whose centers are in one (1) transverse vertical plane or may be included between two (2) parallel transverse vertical planes forty (40) inches apart extending across the full width of the vehicle.

The gross weight imposed on the highway by any tandem axle shall not exceed thirty-four thousand (34,000) pounds exclusive of the tolerance provided in Section 63-5-33. A tandem axle shall be defined as any two (2) or more consecutive axles whose centers are more than forty (40) inches but not more than ninety-six (96) inches apart. No one (1) axle of any such group of two (2) or more consecutive axles shall exceed the weight permitted for a single axle.

Vehicles designed and especially constructed to transport concrete products and which are not available for purchase in sizes and capacities to fully comply with the road and bridge weight laws of the State of Mississippi shall not be made to conform to the axle spacing requirements or axle or tire loadings of this section or to the total combined weights as set out in Section 63-5-33 in Table III, provided (i) that such vehicles shall be limited to a gross weight of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds; (ii) that such vehicles shall only be operated within fifty (50) miles of their home base; (iii) that any such vehicles shall be limited to a maximum load of the rated capacity of the vehicle; (iv) that all such vehicles shall have at least three (3) axles; and (v) that all vehicles with only three (3) axles shall have all wheels brake-equipped. Any two (2) or more axles close enough to be considered an axle group shall be suspended by an equalizing system and be spaced a minimum of four (4) feet apart in order to be eligible for the maximum load as provided in this subsection. It shall be a violation if vehicles to which this subsection applies travel upon any federal interstate highway or upon any roads or bridges designated and posted as incapable of carrying such loads by the Transportation Commission, a board of supervisors, or municipal governing authorities as provided in subsection (5) or (6) of this section.

Vehicles designed and especially constructed to transport raw cotton from harvest to the cotton gin shall not be made to conform to the axle spacing or axle or tire loadings of this section. However, such vehicles (i) shall be limited to a gross weight of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds; (ii) may be operated only within a fifty-mile radius of their home base or their contractual customer; (iii) shall be limited to a maximum load of the rated capacity of that vehicle; (iv) shall have all wheels brake equipped; and (v) are prohibited from traveling upon any federal interstate highway or upon any roads or bridges designated and posted as incapable of carrying such loads by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, a board of supervisors or municipal governing authorities as provided in subsection (5) or (6) of this section.

Vehicles designed and especially constructed to collect and transport solid waste and which are not available for purchase in sizes and capacities to fully comply with the road and bridge weight laws of the State of Mississippi, shall not be made to conform to the axle spacing or tire loadings of this section. However, such vehicles (i) shall be limited to a gross weight of sixty thousand (60,000) pounds; (ii) may be operated only within a fifty-mile radius of their home base or their contractual customer; (iii) shall be limited to a maximum load of the rated capacity of that vehicle; (iv) shall have all wheels brake-equipped; and (v) are prohibited from traveling upon any federal interstate highway or upon any roads or bridges designated and posted as incapable of carrying such loads by the Mississippi Department of Transportation, a board of supervisors or the governing authorities of a municipality as provided in subsection (5) or (6) of this section.

The rear axle of trailer mounted knuckle boom log loaders shall be exempt from the tire loading limitation provided for in subsection (3) of this section; provided, however, that the gross weight imposed on the highway by such an axle shall not exceed forty-one thousand (41,000) pounds.

The board of supervisors of any county or the governing authorities of any municipality, by appropriate resolution, may impose limitations more restrictive than those permitted in this section upon the county highways of such county or the streets of such municipality.

The Mississippi Department of Transportation, for cause, may post or limit any road or bridge to weights less than those permitted by this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8270; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 3; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 5; Laws, 1950, ch. 472; Laws, 1981, ch. 366, § 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 11, 2001.).

§ 63-5-29.
Gross weight of vehicle and loads; Table I.

On all highways of the State of Mississippi except those referred to in Sections 63-5-31 and 63-5-33, and subject to the limitations imposed on wheel and axle loads by Section 63-5-27 and to the further limitations hereinafter specified, the total combined weight (vehicles plus load) on any group of axles shall not exceed the value given in the following table (Table I), corresponding to the distance in feet between the extreme axles of the group, measured longitudinally to the nearest foot:

Distance in Feet Between the Extreme of Any Group of Axles Maximum Load in PoundsCarried on any Group of Axles 4 28,650 5 29,650 6 30,640 7 31,630 8 32,610 9 33,580 10 34,550 11 35,510 12 36,470 13 37,420 14 38,360 15 39,300 16 40,280 17 41,160 18 42,080 19 42,990 20 43,900 21 44,800 22 45,700 23 46,590 24 47,470 25 48,350 26 49,220 27 50,090 28 50,950 29 51,800 30 52,650 31 53,490 32 54,330 33 55,160 34 55,650 35 56,800
36 and greater
57,650 maximum

Click to view

Moreover, in addition to the per axle weight limitation specified by Section 63-5-27, the maximum load carried on a combination of vehicles shall be subject to the following additional limitations: The maximum load carried on any group of two (2) axles shall not exceed twenty-four thousand (24,000) pounds in instances where one or more of such axles is a driving axle (that is, an axle turned by the vehicle’s engine power).

An axle group shall consist of any two (2) or more consecutive axles of any vehicle or combination of vehicles.

Provided, however, that, subject to the limitations imposed on:

Wheel, axle loads, spacing and weight by Sections 63-5-27 and 63-5-33, and

Weight limitations on highways and bridges by Section 65-1-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, any product produced on or distributed from a location on any highway within or without the State of Mississippi may be transported from such place of production or location of distribution by the nearest route toward its destination on such highway or highways to a point where such highway intersects a highway previously found or hereafter found by the commission to be suitable to carry the maximum load limits pursuant to Sections 63-5-33 and 63-5-35; and provided further, that any goods, materials, and equipment actually used in the supply of an activity of producing, manufacturing or distributing products on any such highway within the State of Mississippi may be transported on such highway to the site of such manufacture, production or distribution. However, any penalty assessed against a vehicle operating under the provisions of this paragraph (3) (b) shall be calculated according to the maximum weight which that particular vehicle is legally permitted to transport and not the maximum gross weight limit established for that highway.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed to permit movements of weights in excess of those provided for in this section (63-5-29) over a route or section thereof for the purpose of a shortcut between two (2) highways found by the commission to be suitable to carry the maximum load limits pursuant to Sections 63-5-33 and 63-5-35 or any other purpose not consistent with the aforementioned provisions.

Nothing in Sections 63-5-29, and 63-5-34, shall be construed to imply any general variation from the maximum weight limitations designated by the Mississippi Department of Transportation other than specified in Sections 63-5-29 and 63-5-34.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 1974, ch. 574, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-5-31.
Gross weight of vehicle and loads; Table II.

Subject to the limitations imposed on wheel and axle loads by Section 63-5-27, and to the further limitations hereinafter specified, the total combined weight (vehicles plus load) on any group of axles shall not exceed the value given in the following table (Table II) corresponding to the distance in feet between the extreme axles of the group, measured longitudinally to the nearest foot, on those highways or parts of highways found by the Mississippi Transportation Commission to be suitable to carry such increased load limits from an engineering standpoint, and so designated as such by order of said commission entered on its minutes and published once each week for three successive weeks in a daily newspaper of general circulation in this state:

TABLE II Distance in Feet Betweenthe Extreme of Any Group of Axles Maximum Load in PoundsCarried on any Group of Axles 432,000 532,000 632,000 732,000 832,610 933,779 1034,942 1136,097 1237,246 1338,387 1439,522 1540,649 1641,770 1742,883 1843,990 1945,089 2046,182 2147,267 2248,346 2349,417 2450,482 2551,539 2652,590 2753,633 2854,670 2955,699 3056,722 3157,737 3258,746 3359,747 3460,742 3561,729 3662,710 3763,683 38 and greater64,650 maximum

Click to view

Moreover, in addition to the per axle weight limitations specified by Section 63-5-27, the maximum load carried on a combination of vehicles shall be subject to the following additional limitations: The maximum load carried on any group of two (2) axles shall not exceed twenty-seven thousand (27,000) pounds in instances where one or more of such axles is a driving axle (that is, an axle turned by the vehicle’s engine power).

An axle group shall consist of any two (2) or more consecutive axles of any vehicle or combination of vehicles.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 2001, ch. 596, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 2001.

§ 63-5-33.
Gross weight of vehicle and loads; Table III [Subsection (5) repealed effective July 1, 2022].

Subject to the limitations imposed on wheel and axle loads by Section 63-5-27, and to the further limitations hereinafter specified, the total combined weight (vehicles plus load) on any group of axles of a vehicle or a combination of vehicles shall not exceed the value given in the following table (Table III) corresponding to the distance in feet between the extreme axles of the group, measured longitudinally to the nearest foot, on those highways or parts of highways designated by the Mississippi Transportation Commission as being capable of carrying the maximum load limits and, in addition thereto, such other highways or parts of highways found by the commission to be suitable to carry the maximum load limits from an engineering standpoint, and so designated as such by order of the commission entered upon its minutes and published once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in a daily newspaper published in this state and having a general circulation therein. The maximum total combined weight carried on any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles shall be determined by the formula contained in the Federal Weight Law enacted January 4, 1975, as follows: W=500 (LN/N-1+12N+36) where W=maximum weight in pounds carried on any group of two (2) or more axles computed to the nearest five hundred (500) pounds, L=distance in feet between the extremes of any group of two (2) or more consecutive axles, and N=number of axles in any group under consideration.

Click to view

Moreover, in addition to the per axle weight limitations specified by Section 63-5-27, two (2) consecutive sets of tandem axles may carry a gross load of thirty-four thousand (34,000) pounds each, providing that the overall distance between the first and last axles of such consecutive sets of tandem axles is thirty-six (36) feet or more, except that, until September 1, 1989, the axle distance for tank trailers, dump trailers and ocean transport container haulers may be thirty (30) feet or more. Such overall gross weight may not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds, except as provided by this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 63-5-27 and/or Section 63-5-29 to the contrary, vehicles hauling products in the manner set forth in this subsection, whether or not such vehicles are operating with a harvest permit, shall be allowed a gross weight of not to exceed forty thousand (40,000) pounds on any tandem. Vehicles operating without a harvest permit shall be allowed a tolerance not to exceed five percent (5%) above their authorized gross vehicle weight, tandem or axle weight; except that the maximum gross vehicle weight of any such vehicle shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds plus a tolerance thereon of not more than two percent (2%). Vehicles operating without a harvest permit loading at a point of origin having scales available for weighing the vehicle shall not be eligible for any tolerance over the gross weight limit of eighty thousand (80,000) pounds. Vehicles operating with a harvest permit shall be allowed a tolerance not to exceed ten percent (10%) above their authorized tandem or axle weight, but the maximum gross vehicle weight of any such vehicle shall not exceed eighty-four thousand (84,000) pounds. However, neither the increased weights in this subsection nor any tolerance shall be allowed on federal interstate highways or on other highways where a tolerance is specifically prohibited by the Transportation Commission, the county board of supervisors or the municipal governing authorities as provided for in Section 63-5-27. The tolerance allowed by this subsection shall only apply to the operation of vehicles from the point of loading to the point of unloading for processing, and to the operation of vehicles hauling sand, gravel, woodchips, wood shavings, sawdust, fill dirt, and agricultural products, and products for recycling or materials for the construction or repair of highways. The range of such operation shall not exceed a radius of one hundred (100) miles except where the products are being transported for processing within this state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 63-5-27 and/or Section 63-5-29 to the contrary, vehicles hauling prepackaged products, unloaded at a state port or to be loaded at a state port, which are containerized in such a manner as to make subdivision thereof impractical shall be allowed a gross weight of not to exceed forty thousand (40,000) pounds on any tandem, and a tolerance not to exceed ten percent (10%) above their authorized gross weight, tandem or axle weight; except that the maximum weight of any vehicle shall not exceed eighty thousand (80,000) pounds plus a tolerance thereon of not more than two percent (2%); however, neither the increased weights in this subsection nor any tolerance shall be allowed on federal interstate highways or on other highways where a tolerance is specifically prohibited by the Transportation Commission, the county board of supervisors or the municipal governing authorities as provided for in Section 63-5-27.

Vehicles for which a harvest permit has been issued pursuant to Section 27-19-81(4) shall be allowed a gross vehicle weight not to exceed eighty-four thousand (84,000) pounds. However, the board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality may designate the roads, streets and highways under their respective jurisdiction on and along which vehicles for which a harvest permit has been issued may travel. This subsection shall not apply to the federal interstate system.

Any owner or operator who has been issued a harvest permit and who wishes to operate a vehicle on the roads, streets or highways under the jurisdiction of a county or municipality at a gross vehicle weight greater than the weight allowed by law or greater than the maximum weight established for such roads, streets or highways by the board of supervisors or municipal governing authorities, shall notify, in writing, the board of supervisors or the governing authorities, as the case may be, before operating such vehicle on the roads, streets or highways of such county or municipality. In his notice, the permit holder shall identify the routes over which he intends to operate vehicles for which the permit has been issued and the dates or time period during which he will be operating such vehicles. The board of supervisors or the governing authorities, as the case may be, shall have two (2) working days to respond in writing to the permit holder to notify the permit holder of the routes on and along which the permit holder may operate vehicles for which a harvest permit has been issued. Failure of the board of supervisors or the governing authorities timely to notify the permit holder and to designate the routes on and along which the permit holder may operate shall be considered as authorizing the permit holder to operate on any of the roads, streets or highways of the county or municipality in accordance with the authority granted to the permit holder by the harvest permit.

Anytime a timber deed is filed with the chancery clerk, the grantee, at that time, may make a written request of the board of supervisors of the county or the governing authorities of the municipality, as the case may be, for the purpose of providing to the grantee, within three (3) working days of the filing of the request, a designated and approved route over the roads, streets or highways under the jurisdiction of the county or city, as the case may be, that the grantee may travel for the purpose of transporting harvested timber. Upon providing such route designation, the county or city, as the case may be, shall also provide to the grantee a map designating the approved route. An approved route designation provided to a grantee under the provisions of this paragraph shall be valid for a period of six (6) months from its date of issue. The permit authorized to be issued under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall not be required for any person who obtains a permit issued under this paragraph.

This subsection (5) shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 2022.

Nothing in this section or subsections (1) through (4) of Section 63-5-27 shall be construed to deny the operation of any vehicle or combination of vehicles that could be lawfully operated upon the interstate highway system of this state on January 4, 1975.

TABLE III DISTANCE IN FEET BETWEEN THE EXTREMES OF ANY GROUP OF 2 OR MORE CONSECUTIVE AXLES MAXIMUM LOAD IN POUNDS CARRIED ON ANY GROUP OF 2 OR MORE CONSECUTIVE AXLES 2 axles 3 axles 4 axles 5 axles 6 axles 7 axles 4 34,000 5 34,000 6 34,000 Axle groups in 7 34,000 8 and less 34,000 34,000 these spacings More than 8 38,000 42,000 9 39,000 42,500 10 40,000 43,500 impractical 11 44,000 12 45,000 50,000 13 45,500 50,500 14 46,500 51,500 15 47,000 52,000 16 48,000 52,500 58,000 17 48,500 53,500 58,500 18 49,500 54,000 59,000 19 50,000 54,500 60,000 20 51,000 55,500 60,500 66,000 21 51,500 56,000 61,000 66,500 22 52,500 56,500 61,500 67,000 23 53,000 57,500 62,500 68,000 24 54,000 58,000 63,000 68,500 74,000 25 54,500 58,500 63,500 69,000 74,500 26 55,500 59,500 64,000 69,500 75,000 27 56,000 60,000 65,000 70,000 75,500 28 57,000 60,500 65,500 71,000 76,500 29 57,500 61,500 66,000 71,500 77,000 30 58,500 62,000 66,500 72,000 77,500 31 59,000 62,500 67,500 72,500 78,000 32 60,000 63,500 68,000 73,000 78,500 33 64,000 68,500 74,000 79,000 34 64,500 69,000 74,500 80,000 35 65,500 70,000 75,000 80,000 36 66,000 70,500 75,500 80,000 37 66,500 71,000 76,000 80,000 38 67,500 71,500 77,000 80,000 39 68,000 72,500 77,500 80,000 40 68,500 73,000 78,000 80,000 41 69,500 73,500 78,500 80,000 42 70,000 74,000 79,000 80,000 43 70,500 75,000 80,000 80,000 44 71,500 75,500 80,000 80,000 45 72,000 76,000 80,000 80,000 46 72,500 76,500 80,000 80,000 47 73,500 77,500 80,000 80,000 48 74,000 78,000 80,000 80,000 49 74,500 78,500 80,000 80,000 50 75,500 79,000 80,000 80,000 51 76,000 80,000 80,000 80,000 52 76,500 80,000 80,000 80,000 53 77,500 80,000 80,000 80,000 54 78,000 80,000 80,000 80,000 55 78,500 80,000 80,000 80,000 56 79,500 80,000 80,000 80,000 57 80,000 80,000 80,000 80,000

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8271; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1946, ch. 307, § 4; Laws, 1948, ch. 328, § 6; Laws, 1954, ch. 335; Laws, 1958, ch. 501; Laws, 1960, ch. 409; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 22; Laws, 1964, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 1981, ch. 366, § 6; Laws, 1981, ch. 532, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 479, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 364; Laws, 1989, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 478, § 2; Laws, 1994, ch. 501, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 408, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 548, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 592, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 589, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 386, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 554, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 485, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 343, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 425, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2018.